Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 6
COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ACT -
LONG-TERM CARE

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2006 containing provisions of some sections formerly located in article 4 of title 26. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 25.5-4-103.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

olorado Medicaid Home and

C

ommunity-Based Services and Least-Restrictive Environment", see 39 Colo. Law. 35 (May 2010).

Section

PART 1 LONG-TERM CARE ADMINISTRATION

PART 2 NURSING FACILITIES

PART 3 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR THE ELDERLY, BLIND, AND DISABLED

PART 4 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

PART 5 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH HEALTH COMPLEXES RELATED TO ACQUIRED IMMUNE DEFICIENCY SYNDROME

PART 6 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH MAJOR MENTAL HEALTH DISORDERS

PART 7 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH BRAIN INJURY

PART 8 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR CHILDREN WITH AUTISM

PART 9 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICE PROGRAMS FOR CHILDREN

PART 10 CONSUMER-DIRECTED ATTENDANT SUPPORT FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES

PART 11 CONSUMER-DIRECTED CARE

PART 12 IN-HOME SUPPORT SERVICES

PART 13 COMPLEMENTARY AND ALTERNATIVE MEDICINE FOR A PERSON WITH A SPINAL CORD INJURY

PART 14 MEDICAID BUY-IN

PART 15 TRANSITION SERVICES

PART 16 HOME CARE EMPLOYEES' COMPENSATION AND TRAINING

PART 17 CASE MANAGEMENT SERVICES FOR LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS

PART 18 COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS FOR DISBURSEMENT OF FEDERAL FUNDS UNDER THE FEDERAL "AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021"